District of Columbia statutes.
29-924

Subscribers.

Any individual or group eligible for membership and legally obligated to purchase a share or shares of, or membership in, an association shall be deemed a subscriber. The articles or bylaws may determine whether, and the conditions under which, any voting rights or other rights of membership are granted to subscribers.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-824.
1981 Ed., § 29-1124.
2001 Ed., § 29-924.